


GoDaddy Hosting Reviews - Is Their Hosting Service Worth It?














 Home
 Recommended
 Not Recommended
 Review List
 Blog
GoDaddy Review
Updated: June 7, 2015 by  Don't be scared to share... They have been getting better than they were in the past.  I can’t recommend GoDaddy to people seeking web hosting at this time.  There are much better options for your web hosting needs. 


 



 











 


Established Business
Website Builder
A+ With The Better Business Bureau
Features
Customer Support




Slow Loading Times
Frequent Site Hacks
Performance Issues


 

 





When I was a new user I was overwhelmed with GoDaddy.  They market themselves as easy to use.  People just quit their jobs and sign up with GoDaddy and make tons of money.  Actually, it seems like they sign up with them and spend tons of money and get tricked into products and services they do not want.  They are all happy and claim to really want to help you.  When you sign up with them you will wish you never did though.  They are the biggest mistake of my life.

I have setup an account with them and used cPanel for the last 4 months.  Wordpress sites get hacked left and right with them.  I have invested money in iTheme security and that has been my lifeline for the last 4 months.  Each and every month I can expect my site to be defaced, injected with some random PHP code, or completely offline with a message from GoDaddy saying that malware has been found on my website.

I will clean up the malware and have them run a scan on it.  They will provide me with more pages, plugins, etc. that need cleaning again.  It is taking so much of my time just fixing my site every couple weeks.

Then they suggest that I upgrade to a VPS because my site can not be on their shared server.  It is using to many resources.  The memory limit is exceeded.  The CPU usage is high, my inode limit has been maxed out.  I have went from Deluxe to Ultimate, and now the Developer plan.  The next one they want me to upgrade to is the VPS plan or $30/month.

I wish I would have read what people were saying about GoDaddy prior to signing up with their service.  I could have saved myself a lot of time and hassles.  I will not be upgrading with them anymore.  I am a little confused on how to migrate a website, but it looks like it is something I am just going to have to learn to do!

If you learn anything at all it is simply this; do not host with GoDaddy it is not worth it!


 
 
 
 



I have been eyeing GoDaddy when I was shopping around for the right web host.  A lot of places on the net have mixed reviews about them.  I can say that my experience with them has been awesome. I made the right decision because after I signed up to their service I am a happy camper.  So far it has been 6 months and I really do love them. My goal was to find a decent webhost for my photography website.  I don’t have any web design experience so I needed something that was easy to use, but looks attractive. I was planning to build my online portfolio to show the world and potential clients that I can produce great pictures.  They have an awesome website builder. It’s really easy to use.

I love how GoDaddy gives me value for my money.  A lot of other web hosting companies will charge nearly double what they charge. I love the way they charge me with the cheapest plans that I can ever find in this industry. I decided to go economy by availing of their Economy web hosting.

The uptime with GoDaddy is great. They do live up to their reputation of being up 99.9 percent of the time. 

The best part about GoDaddy is their customer service.  They are always quick to answer the phone and help me with anything I need help with.  I never get the feeling like they are trying to get me off the phone quickly.  I’m always blown away by how quick and helpful they are.

Really, there is nothing bad I can say about GoDaddy.  My experience with them has been great.  5 stars all the way around.


 
 
 
 



I actually used them for reseller plans which was a huge mistake. I totally regret being responsible for somebody elses dilemma all because I thought this was a decent service.  I wish I would have done more research on them before signing up with them for 5 years! One of the customers that I have convince to take on GoDaddy service.  They have issues about their PayPal charges. This web host reply was to give this customer 72 hours before they can restore the service.

In this online world, 72 hours can lose you almost everything. Customers go away thinking your site is no longer online. This is why it is highly recommended to have your backup. In case something happens you are left with the job to appease angry customers. This did happen to this customer and somehow I am to be indirectly blame for it. I feel so bad as If somehow I am the reason why he was going through all of this. 

It really makes it hard to keep my paying customers paying with GoDaddy.  I get blamed for everything and GoDaddy does nothing to help me out.  I really regret my decision of using GoDaddy for my reseller hosting business.


 
 
 
 



One of the things that makes GoDaddy lacking is their customer support.  Whenever a client of mine uses GoDaddy I always roll my eyes. I can say I have worked on sites that were hosted with them and we always have problems or issues with them. The people who answered me on the phone don’t have any idea about web hosting at all. It is surprising since they are a web host.  I will only buy domain names with them. Others give them the same review on this department. The general consensus is that they do not offer a good support at all. They do limit storage, bandwidth and resource usage. 

For instance, installing a simple Wordpress site seems to have frequent bugs.  I use Genesis on most of my Wordpress sites.  They are always updated to the latest version, but GoDaddy has issues with them.  During different parts of the day the website will slow down tremendously making it impossible to work on my website.

It all goes back to customer support though.  I will point this out and ask that they migrate the site to another server.  They are reluctant to do so, but once they do we still notice the same problems.  The issue is their servers.  They oversell them!

In 2 years my clients site has been hacked  12 times too.  I am getting sick and tired of using Wordfence to restore the files that were infected.  GoDaddy will run a scan on your website, but they never find anything.  I just do it myself with Wordfence.  This takes up more of my RAM on my server and slows everything down. 

I have begged and pleaded that my clients use SiteGround instead of GoDaddy, but for people that are not all that technical spending more money on something they know nothing about is a troublesome task.


 
 
 
 



I liked my server for sometime, shared and reliable for the first couple months, but as I started using it Wordpress started updating and 500 and 503 errors kept popping up randomly especially in the end of my second year with them. I cannot complain out about their customer service, they were always willing to take a look at my site, fix any scripting problems and even assisted me with running multiple subdomains. But customer service does not make a domain, the service does. Speed was unreliable, especially as I started hosting multiple portfolio items, and getting my website how I wanted. For the price, it is expensive, I transferred all my domains out and am now hosting on Inmotion.


 
 
 
 



This is the most unreliable web hosting company ever!  They completely lost all my data and I had to pay $150 to get it back.  True, I am an idiot for not keeping backups on Amazon or Dropbox, but really that is ridiculous amount to charge to recover your data.  I guess this is where they make up for the cheap price tag.  Fool me once, but never again!


 
 
 
 



Just to let folks know, a simple support question by a user, not a company owner, regarding why trash folder won't empty, was denied assistance. If that is how they (Go Daddy) treats their users, I can understand why folks are leaving their customer base.


 
 
 
 



Well, it has been some time since I did have GoDaddy to host my site. Way back when, they used to offer Wordpress sites for their customers. So, I had one with them, but it did not last long. Apparently, they had so much trouble, I began to use it less and less often. Then, they decided to do away with it all together. So, when I went looking for my blog that I rarely posted anything on, they said they got rid of their WP blogs and that I had to just deal with it... pretty much. 

Since then, I only used their freebie pages or forwarding to another host provider. At present, I am using two host providers. One for static websites, and the other is for my WordPress sites. As for other services they provide, I have not been too happy with their antics lately. It seems they are only interested in gouging domains. I have requested, on numerous occasions, a potential price for domains that I was interested in selling, but they will not respond. 

It seems to me, they would rather keep ignoring my requests hoping that I would give up and let the domains expire. And, sure enough, I did allow that to happen on quite a few. So, I really never knew what they might be worth as GoDaddy had the incentive to take and hold a backorder from someone else - thus taking away my ability to make a profit on a domain I owned. ...So, ...no... not real happy as of late with GoDaddy.


 
 
 
 



One thing that is really bad about Go Daddy is the website builder does not allow you to link your pages together.  I have had this problem for about 3 weeks now.  I can’t believe that they would put out a product that serves exactly no purpose at all.  I have contacted them a number of times.  Each time they say they will be rolling out a new version.  The ETA is always unknown.  Really getting very frustrated with them.  I have been using them for 9 months but I really considering migrating to another company.  Not thrilled about the upcoming change, but is something that is probably in my near future.


 
 
 
 



I think a lot of webmasters here have fallen into the trap of using GoDaddy as their web hosting provider.  I was like many people; and my experience from Oct 3 - December 16 (2014) wasn't a very fun experience.  For starters a simple Wordpress site can't run smoothly on their server.  You do get error 503 errors all the time.  Frequently, I would have to get on the phone to see what the problem was.  Their tech would always tell me it's working on their end; maybe I should refresh my browser cache and make sure my internet connection works.  It happen about 2 times a week.  Finally, after I got sick and tired of it I finally just gave up on them and went to Digital Ocean.  Guess what the problem was instantly fixed.  I have been using their servers for 4 months and have no 503 error messages.  Just a word of caution to anyone considering GoDaddy you might want to take this review to heart.  They have a lot of issues and I will never use their service again.


 
 
 
 



Support Sucks, Every Problem Has One Solution Upgrade Please, Try Any Other Host!


 
 
 
 



I have been with godaddy for almost 7+ years on the delux plan (unlimited websites, unlimited size, unlimited traffic)  Uptime - 88% (yes I was shocked when I started tracking them with uptimerobot).  I recently put two ecommerce sites on godaddy. The traffic grew to 1500 visitors per day per site and that's when all issues started happening.  Till the time only blogs were hosted with a daily traffic of maybe 150+ visitors per day per site, no issues.  So I started tracking uptime and other metrics. Site speeds were ridiculously slow, page loads slower, error 403 happening almost 3 times everyday.  For two weeks regularly on a daily basis I spoke to godaddy support without any resolution.  Finally godaddy sent me a network violation email and locked me out of my cpanel and ftp. I got the ftp back, but am still fighting with them to get cpanel back to be able to move out my sites from them.  They have my money for the hosting that I paid for a year in advance, My sites are down, they are not letting me take my databases out.  The mail says number of files exceed 1024. I haven't heard of such BS ever.  Traffic increases, godaddy screws you over.  Host elsewhere, don't even go near them. Most unpleasant and the customer service is absolutely unhelpful and just keep passing the buck to other teams in godaddy.  Each phone call lasted 20mins to 50 mins, waste of money and time and energy. I would rather pay a couple of $ more and be assured my sites will not face any issues.


 
 
 
 



This is what I have found when using GoDaddy's website builder.  I used it for 5 months.  In terms of functionality it is spotty at best.  Meaning that changing different elements on your website can be a chore.  I have messed stuff up a number of times.  Really, not a big deal to change back to previous stage and kind of fun to play with though.  Do I think its bad.  No, not by any means.  In fact, I really do like it.

However, there is one thing I really don't like about this website builder.  They block your images URLS in the robot.txt file.  Meaning that by default they block the search engines from crawling your images.  This is a big mistake and I had to call GoDaddy in order to get this changed.  They did it right away, but for months I went along updating my site and didn't know why they weren't showing up in Google.  For a lot of webmasters this probably isn't a huge deal.  However, for me I am a freelance photographer and my images are an essential part of my business.  

Other than that issue they are fine.  Been using them for 2 years and don't have any other problems with them.


 
 
 
 



Wow is this a GoDaddy bashing or review?  I have been using them for almost 10 years and I don't feel this review is accurate at all.  It looks like a lot of outdated information.  Response times are not 60 ms for GoDaddy sites.  In fact, that graphic was taken almost 1 year ago.  How can you post something that absurd and then claim that your post was created on December 10, 2014?  Really that is how low you stoop?

500 errors are a thing of the past.  I know what you're talking about 4-5 years ago, but to say that you will still have this and post it on your GoDaddy review is completely misleading.  GoDaddy does not cram way to many clients on their servers.  In fact, they use server redundancy.  Do you even know what that means?

As far as their BBB rating is concerned you have to factor in that they are a very big company.  Naturally, they are going to have a lot of moron webmasters that are complaining about them.  I'm sure Target and Walmart have complaints about their company, as well.  I can't even believe you put that part in your review.  Again, your review just looks like a bashing of the company.  

Obviously, you're not a fan of them.  However you should keep your negative thoughts to yourself.  You only benefit from people buying hosting plans that pay you in terms of affiliate commissions.  I'm no moron here.  Your hosting review site doesn't look to legit to me!  I will be forwarding your review of GoDaddy to them.  Hopefully, they take a look at it and tell you off!


 
 
 
 



Go daddy has some of the best customer support out there.  I am new to developing sites.  I just graduated college.  I was blown away by the level of support you get though.  I have used live chat and phone support.  They really took a lot of time to help me with PHPadmin and backing up my MySQL databases.  

Granted, I have only been using their service for about 3 months but so far I am very happy with them.  They are always helpful.  Their prices are very cheap.  I got a domain name for 1 dollar and I am paying about 4 dollars per month.


 
 
 
 



I have been using GoDaddy's website builder for about 6 months.  For the most part it's actually quite good.  Version 7 is much better than 6.  I do like the themes a lot.  Do keep in mind if you change your theme you will lose all your contents data though.  I made that mistake once.  Good thing I had the text backed up in a Word file.  We are using one for our real estate business.  Uploading our images and forms are very easy with this website builder.  We don't know anything about web design, but after 2 hours were pretty comfortable with it.

The SEO wizard is actually pretty good.  I don't know anything about SEO, but was pretty easy to get my sites pages indexed in Google.  I don't have any problem paying about 6 dollars per month for an easy to use website  builder.  It's either that or spend 2-4k just to have a website designed.  Our site looks pretty good and very professional!


 
 
 
 



I have been using them for 3 months now.  They have gone above and beyond to help me.  There were a number of things I found overpowering at times.  For instance, I wanted to install wordpress but I was unsure how to do it.  Then I wanted to install a couple premium plugins/widgets and the Headway theme (great DIY theme) on my site.  GoDaddy even recommended a free caching plugin to install on my site.  They also helped me optimize it.

Really Go Daddy is a great web hosting company.  Thanks to Connie (one of their customer support agents).  Sorry I forget the other 2 techs names, but they were very helpful too.  She was so friendly and helped me for 30 minutes on my website.  True, I am a complete newbie, but she made me feel comfortable and was super friendly.  

Our site has been up and running for 2 months now.  I really feel that I am in good hands with Go Daddy.  They are easy to use, lots of features, and break their backs to help you with anything you need.  I wouldn't use any other host.  I am a loyal customer for life.


 
 
 
 



Ok, this is going to be long review of GoDaddy so please bare with me.  I am a little long winded.  I will show you what I love and hate about them.What I love about GoDaddy?Price.  The prices are incredible.  No one else can match these prices.  I usually Google promo codes whenever I purchase domain names or renew my web hosting.Features.  Whether you want a shared, VPS, reseller, or dedicated plan they have everything.  You can get emails and SSL from them too.Control Panel.  They are currently using cPanel.  Didn't used to be this way and the one they were using was a real headache.  Sorry I forget the name of it. Support.  Telephone support is amazing with them.  Be sure to have your security code handy because they will ask for it.  I have talked to them a number of times and they were always helpful.  Very professional and friendly telephone customer support.Uptime.  For the most part our site is always up.What I hate about GoDaddy?They are a big brand and sometimes I feel like I am just another number to them.  For instance, you don't have that 1 on 1 personalized help that some other smaller companies have.  If there is a big problem they will just notify the masses and tell you to read a post they wrote on it.  For instance, phishing, DDoS, etc. will just be posted on their website.  If you want to speak to someone on the phone it seems you don't speak to the same person that often.Support.  Live chat is really frustrating.  It took me 32 minutes to connect with an agent last night.   I had a cold and my voice was going out so I didn't want to pick up the phone and talk with someone the other night.Upsells.  GoDaddy will try to sell you extra services and upgrade your products every time you buy something.  If you're not careful you can accidentally buy something extra when you just want a domain name or something.  I have made this mistake a number of times.  They will refund you for it, but it's really a hassle.  Also, be prepared to get calls from GoDaddy from time to time.  They call for upsells and then just to survey you.Performance.  At times our site runs slow.  But other times it runs great!There are two sides to GoDaddy.  One of the sides is great while the other side is horrible.  I'm a little torn on how I want to rate them because I have mixed feelings about their services.  But, after thinking about it for a bit decided to give them 3 out of 5.  Not a horrible company, but not a great company.  However, I do still use their service.


 
 
 
 



I used GoDaddy years ago and left.  However, I have heard they have made a lot of changes and decided I wanted to give them another shot.  I was working on a clients site that was using GoDaddy and noticed that a lot of things have changed since I used to use their service.  Boy was I glad that I did give them another shot.  What I like about GoDaddy now is:\r\n\r\nThey use cPanel.\r\n\r\nServer speed has drastically increased.\r\n\r\n99.9% uptime.  Didn't always used to be this way.\r\n\r\nBasically, one of the biggest complaints with me was they used to use some other funky control panel.  Now they use cPanel so there is no issue with me.  It used to take ages to load your website.  In fact, there were times when it took 10-13 seconds to load up our site.  Not anymore.  It only takes about 2 seconds to load up our site.  Uptime is great.  We have monitored it through siteuptime.com for 148 days our uptime is 99.97% of the time.  This is great!\r\n\r\nSo what I am trying to say is GoDaddy generally does get bad feedback from a lot of webmasters.  However, they have taken the time to make some major changes.  So, even though I used to hate this company a lot I actually really like them now.  Customer support is amazing and they have the best prices in the industry.\r\n\r\nThe only bad thing I can say about GoDaddy is they call you and try to upsell you different products and services.  I requested that they take me off their call list and they did.  All and all, they are a good company to do business with.


 
 
 
 



We have been using go daddy for the better part of 4 years and haven't had any 500 errors, downtime, or any server issues at all.  In fact, our experience is quite different than your review shows.  Our sites run quickly and they have never overloaded their servers.  Customer support is very friendly and gets issues resolved with a real sense of urgency.  We will continue to use there service for another 4 years!


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy hasn't been a fun experience.  Their website builder never works properly.  It seems to be a daily thing.  I will go through and make a ton of different changes and later find out that none of the changes are actually in effect.  I know I am doing it correctly because I have talked to an agent on the phone.  They walked me through it.  So, I guess you can say their support is good.  However, in terms of their products being functional that is a whole different story.  

I am not all that advanced with web design, but really GoDaddy hasn't been a run experience for me.  I am currently in the process of looking for a host that offers an affordable website builder.  I am cutting my ties with GoDaddy and moving elsewhere.  3 months of this is way to long.  I should have quit them 2 months ago.  Don't use them if you actually want a website builder that works.


 
 
 
 



I have been using GoDaddy for 4 years and haven't had any real problems.  I was happy that they started using cPanel about 1 1/2 years ago.  They have steadily been improving ever since.  

You can't beat the prices though.  Sometimes we do notice a little downtime.   Not really an issue though.  Will continue to use there service.  4 years and going strong now.


 
 
 
 



I don't see how you could possibly give them 4 stars for customer support.  They are god awful!  From my experience they should get 0 stars.Seldom would you see a hosting provider not offering any form of email support.  This is exactly what they do. This is actually one of the strongest points why I decided to go with GoDaddy in the first place.  It's time consuming to pick up the phone.  If I can always just email them I will. I was horrified when I learned that there are certain departments that you cannot reach inside this hosting provider like their technical department who I badly need this time. As a result of this, our site was down for the better part of more than a day and a half. Whoever is handling GoDaddy's emails are not answering them. I even resorted to calling them but I was told in not so many words that I have to wait while they try to find a solution to my technical issue.  There was no explanation or anything. They also told me to wait for their department to get in touch via email.One thing is clear; they are not trying their best to help me solve this issue. I am not willing to wait on the fence until they have come to their senses. I have decided to move my business elsewhere where I will be better cared for and appreciated as a paying customer. After all, customers should always be prioritized if they want their business to succeed.  What's in a name if they cannot help me with a simple issue? Okay to be fair, if they cannot immediately resolve it in the first place I would appreciate an honest reply rather than making me wait that long. I cannot afford to wait this long since I got a business to run.Goodbye GoDaddy you have lost a customer.  Learn from me; if you need email support they won't do a thing for you.


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy is supposed to be a pro in this industry but they make it hard for you to navigate their site.  I can't stand the million upsells.  Don't get me started about the phone calls. Instead of being helpful they would create confusion especially to those who are not an expert on these matters. There was a time that it was not this way with GoDaddy. They started off as somebody good at marketing their service and better at delivering them. The support during that time was decent. At this time if you need technical support you will be left on the lurch. If ever you decide to send them an email all  that you will get is a response that says that you need to call their 24/7 hotline instead.The problem is that when you call their customer support it says that you have to wait some more because their agents are busy taking other calls. Now, my concern is technical in nature and not something that you can just look with the help of their how-to articles. I even resorted to looking for forums that refer to these issues. Some of the answers that I found were more helpful than the ones that GoDaddy offers. There was a time that a simple technical issue like this will only take a maximum of days for this host to resolve. Gone are those days. There are no easy fix ups. They have become hard to work with especially these days. If they are that enthusiastic to sell their service then they better shape up if they still want their clients like me to stick with them.But their prices are pretty good and uptime is decent.  There are good and bad things about each company.  I have mixed feelings and give them 2 out of 5 stars.  If stuff doesn't start to improve soon I will be going elsewhere.


 
 
 
 



Call me impress by how the customer service handled my concerns during one of those days when I was just beginning to work on one of my sites.  Seriously, their customer support is truly amazing. Through the years that follow GoDaddy has continually made a believer out of me. One of the most important factors that make a business work is when it can provide you with the best experience while being under their service. All of the times that I called up for assistance the guys behind the technical team were very understanding. They did not ridicule nor sound superior while they patiently explain what I need to do to have my password change. I commend your good service guys. 

To anyone that is considering them I would just suggest that you go ahead and sign up with them.  .99 domains are great, but the customer support and dependability is even better.  I would never host with any other company!


 
 
 
 



I don't use them, but have heard horror stories about people that have used their service.  I even heard from a friend of mine who shared her experience with GoDaddy. She said that if you received an offer from this host to check "Domain Protection Service" better pass the offer. This seemingly innocent feature will actually make it difficult for you to transfer your domain when it is time to move it. If you think that these are the only issues with this host there still more to come. When you are contemplating to transfer your domain they will only deal with you if you are the individual whose name appears as the account holder.


 
 
 
 



I don't like it, now I use senergyweb.com and I am way more happy than before.  They are so much better!


 
 
 
 



Whatever happened to GoDaddy's website builder?  This once decent web hosting provider has gone rogue. For starters, the changes are not user friendly; it made my life too difficult. I got to run a business and would not like to deal with these inconveniences. I cannot even use copy and paste functions.  Seriously, is it not compatible with every browser?  Commonly, I will have content I can't get out of the sidebar.  I am now repenting at leisure all because I have made the wrong decision to take on GoDaddy's offer. There was a time when their name became famous for providing good quality service at a fair price. What happen to this service? Instead of going forward they have taken a step back in the wrong direction. It seems instead of doing something to improve what they have to offer they have become complacent.If it was my business I would gladly deliver the best service that I can ever give to my clients after all, they are the reason why my business works. There were several issues that remain unresolved. I was trying my best to salvage what I can but no help came forth from GoDaddy. Finally, I have decided that enough is enough and decided to cancel my order since they cannot resolve my issues. I do not expect them to be perfect but at least provide me a decent service as they are known for in the past. Their sales representative is so enthusiastic trying to sell me a lot of things that I do not really need. It really pisses me off that in the midst of my problems they will try to sell me more stuff.  Why don't you make sure I am happy with what I have before you try to sell me more crap!The bottom line is GoDaddy will sell you any and everything, but once you take the plunge that is exactly what you do.  Sink into the black hole of GoDaddy.  I will never use their service again in my life!


 
 
 
 



I am puzzled how GoDaddy cannot register my domain name. I tried getting in touch with them at least several times each time I am calling to follow up whether they were able to find a solution to my problem.  Apparently, there is some big problem and I can't point my DNS to their servers.  Not propagating over or always in an endless loop.  Very time consuming for me!  I then decided to go with Inmotion for this particular issue and the latter registered my site in an instant without making me wait for a few days like this web host. Sad to say that if they cannot provide me with the most basic service that I need then it's time to move elsewhere. Somebody who is as popular as they are should have known how to fix this issue. If you are contemplating on accepting their offer; think twice before availing of their poor service.  Consider this a warning. It is for your own good anyways. I just don't want to see people hurting their business all because their web host service simply sucks at it. Avoid.  They are a waste of time!


 
 
 
 



I can enthusiastically claim that I am please with GoDaddy's service. Their uptime alone is enough to impress me. It is there most of the time offering 99% uptime. I cannot claim the same from my previous web host, Hostgator whom I have abandoned for this reason. Any self-respecting website owner would gladly agree with me that downtime equates to a kiss of death especially if you are running a business or active and responsive website. I am just surprise how catty some people are about their complaints about this web host provider. Yes, they are a bit expensive as compared to other similar services. However, this price is given back to you in the form of being given first class service. 

I can boast that GoDaddy has helped me find the solutions to the problems that I encounter from time to time. The transfer of my website from the previous one to theirs went on smoothly. By the way, I have decided to sign up through their managed WordPress service. My site was fast to reload. This is a good way to encourage more and more people to visit my site. No matter how many photos I decided to upload GoDaddy never fails me. I stand watching and browsing my site on another computer just to see it from a visitor's perspective and I can say that I am well-pleased. If you would ask me if I can recommend this host, my answer is a resounding yes. I will gladly tell you that you will not repent getting their expert service.


 
 
 
 



There are actually a lot of reasons why I love GoDaddy. For starters, their site is user friendly. As far as domain registration is concern there are times when this web host offers discounts.  Really, you can't beat these offers.  Cheap domain names.   Can't find them anywhere! Some people might view this as erratic changes but for me as long as I am benefiting from these changes why complain? I am proud to say that I am using this host to build my websites. So far I got 10 of them under GoDaddy and will be registering other new ones as well. I am happy with what they are doing. They are competitive more than I can say for other companies that I used to get for these same services. 

It was great that I was able to read some of the reviews about this host that convince me to try their services. When I asked my friends they have nice things to say about GoDaddy as well. If there is a fans club for this service we would be the first ones to sign up for it.  Seriously, I don't understand this negative review on GoDaddy. Count me a satisfied customer who wants more of what this host has to offer. One of my friends, who are by the way a designer by profession, recommends this site as well. I can only agree with her. When swap stories of how this host has provided us with the technical assistance that we need when we really need it. If there is something more that I can add just to give these people a commendation for job well done I would gladly do it.

Awesome service and I don't agree with this GoDaddy review.  I have been using them for 4 years and never once had a problem.  In fact, they have done everything I asked and more.  Go ahead and give them a try!


 
 
 
 



If there is one word that I would use to describe GoDaddy it would be too aggressive. Oops, that's actually two words. One thing that I admire about this web host provider is that they are good at selling their product. Just click on the reviews posted on their site and you will get a pop-up from somebody from their end who will live chat with you. This could be admirable if I was not subjected to what I consider the worse customer service that I can get for my site. First of all when you send emails these comes from no reply email addresses. Does GoDaddy really want to place you on the top of their list or they are just there to sell you their service and leave you behind when the deal is made?  I suggest that you give this a try, contact their customer support on the phone and you have to wait for at least 40 minutes to be able to do so.  I got a web developer buddy who said that by far this site is the worst that he has seen so far. His sites were down for a few hours from time to time. When you are trying to establish your online reputation, the problem is that you will lose face especially if you are dealing with clients. This is true if you are into eCommerce. One thing GoDaddy is also known for is that they are great at domain switching then it goes downhill from here.


 
 
 
 



Here we go again.  I wake up all pumped to work on my new website and to my surprise there is a 500 error message on the site.  I wait for 20 minute and it goes away.  No big deal right.  Well, 2 hours later and it's another 500 error message.  Tired of calling Go Daddy only to be left feeling like a fool.  This has been an ongoing problem that I have dealt with for 4 months now.

From a simple search on the net it looks like I am not the only one who has had this problem time and time again.  You might find this link interesting on hosting with them and having 500 error messages: http://wordpress.org/support/topic/blob-suffering-with-godaddy-hosting-downtime-and500-internal-server-error

I have washed my hands with them.  No more pain with them.  Moving on.


 
 
 
 



Really this is one of the biggest mistakes you can make as a small business.  Their servers have issue after issue.  Yes, you can expect downtime which happens quite frequently.  No joke, last week our site was down for 3 hours AGAIN!  I would encourage you to look elsewhere if you're considering Go Daddy.  They are a nightmare I wouldn't wish on my biggest enemy.


 
 
 
 



I sadly used GoDaddy's email service and I am now realizing that this is probably the biggest mistake I have ever made.  We had an email plan that was $47.88 per month.  We are surprised that we have received an email that states our new bill is going to be $143.64 each month.  This is three times what it was a year ago!

I really feel cheated by GoDaddy.  I am now just going to use gmail because I can't afford to pay almost $150 just so I have an email account.  Horrible business practices!  Avoid!


 
 
 
 



One thing that I did not see coming is how GoDaddy have been solely focused on domain hosting and auctions. At first I thought this was a very convenient setup for me. After all, this web hosting provider is offering domain registrations left and right.  Why not just host with them?  What is the worst that could happen? Servers run very cheeky when you host with them.  I have installed Wordpress on lots of different sites on their servers over the years.  If there is one thing we can always count on its that we are going to have problems.  Internal errors, hacking, slow loading time, email problems, etc.  

Every time I have a client that uses them I beg and plead with them to use any other host but them.  I haven't used GoDaddy for 7 years with my business sites or personal sites.  Their servers are jam packed with websites.  I don't think they limit them to a server.  Just any and everything seems to go on their servers.  They have way to many problems to sort out.  Don't use this company for web hosting.  They are the worst!


 
 
 
 



I was pleasantly surprised to find somebody that I can rely on for my first Wordpress blog. GoDaddy is always there 24/7, even during late nights and any time of the day.  Seriously, they have the best customer support!  They will walk you through any and everything. The website host team assisted me with my technical issues and gives me clear directions on how to fix my problems.  I have yet to have a problem they couldn't handle. It was so easy to set-up my own website in no time. GoDaddy assisted me from the setup process up to the web hosting side. With such a world - class kind of service what more can I ask for? This company made a believer out of me to the point that I am now reselling their products. I am a living proof that this website host is one of the best in this business. I would like to commend several guys who have helped me set up my site. When it accidentally crashes because of my mistake, Nick has been helpful and friendly enough to assist my needs as a business owner. Even my team was simply amazed by how he guided me every step of the way. I can definitely say that he simply did not just make my day, but my entire year as well. This is how I am so thankful with Nick's assistance. In case, you ever face a similar problem like mine, please do not hesitate to look for Nick Brouwer, he comes highly recommended by me. I was so impressed with his performance that I can never thank him enough for what he has done for my business. I am eternally grateful Nick and GoDaddy. Consider me a loyal customer from now on.I am a reseller for GoDaddy and this doesn't just make me write them a positive review.  This review is backed by hundreds of people.  I highly recommend them to anyone looking for high quality web hosting provider.


 
 
 
 



Please don't make the same mistake that I did when I was tempted by the good offers that entice me to use Go Daddy in the first place. I can honestly say that the only department that really works with this web hosting provider is their sales department. They caught me at a moment of weakness.  Once you are a customer of theirs they will call you to sell you more stuff you don't want.   If you want to face a lot of horror filled hours being offline they go for it.  We get frequent downtime each and every week.  There is no reason for it.  Sometimes our site just goes offline.  Make me look like an idiot when I am showing a client something.   

Their email system is always broken.  You will just spend much of your time tracing how to get all of the emails that you lost through their inefficient service.  Their email runs buggy through Apple Mail. I consider their business emails a bad idea.  It takes 5-20 minutes for our email to get sent to us.  Sometimes they even bounce back. 

After all you would not like paying for bad service.  If you go with them you will find out just how bad they actually are. I consider this one of the few mistakes that I hope to get out of. They made me wait for almost an day before I can speak to a customer support representative (via ticket request). I was just wondering how they manage to sweet talk me into availing of their services. They were so enthusiastically upselling their services. 

I consider Go Daddy to be one of the worst domain registration companies that I have ever come across with. Because of this recent turn of events, I am contemplating on transferring all of my domains to Namecheap.  

I was so disappointed when I lost one of my domains all because Go Daddy did not remind me that my contract was about to expire.  I checked the spam folder but there was nothing there.  Now, I have to pay a ton to get it back or wait 90 days to get it for cheap. They could not make me believe in their service again.  Avoid this company at all cost.


 
 
 
 



So far there is nothing that I can complain about with the support that I am having with Go-Daddy.  They are always quick to respond to my tickets and take care of issues immediately over the phone.  Remarkable service!   

After I purchase a domain with them I was so excited and could not wait to get my site up and running. In the midst of my enthusiasm I misspelled my domain.  I was sweating it, but they fixed it right away. The next day I talked with their tech people and was so pleasantly surprise when they refunded my money and cancelled the misspelled name.  Really, they didn't have to but they went that extra mile for me. Building the right domain was just a breeze because of this. Go-Daddy made the process so easy and my technical issue was resolve in no time. Within minutes I used their site builder to layout my website.

The tech people even help me build a user-friendly and easy to navigate site. However, the process to do this was not without its share of kinks. I suggest that they would post a webinar that explains the process. They do have a lot of how-to articles on their website though.
It is hard for somebody who is just learning the process to put up a site like this. As if this was not enough, Go-Daddy offered my new site full support. Their awesome service allowed me to run my site with 99% uptime. 

I have heard of horror stories about other web hosting provider that did not allow people to have a wonderful experience with their website.  That is certainly not the case with them, though.  I thank my lucky stars that Go-Daddy is not one of this who promises too much but delivers too little.


 
 
 
 



I wouldn't use Go Daddy.  Seems to be a trap a lot of newbie webmasters fall into.  Very buggy servers and lots of people don't like them.  I made the mistake of using them 8 years ago.  Will never use them again.


 
 
 
 



I hate inconsistency especially when it comes to being given information and assistance with website hosting. I sure do notice that GoDaddy has different kinds of support and sales team. Some are good at what they do; these chosen few do know how to deliver good service.  I have had reps that were awesome but some where horrible! However, their customer support team is not like this all the time. I was just wondering how they train their employees. How come some offer good knowledge of their product and services while others simply suck at it? These rude and ignorant people should not be allowed to let loose without undergoing proper formal training. 

Their poor performance shows that they are not properly train to offer the best service that one expects from a big player in this business. As an example one of those who assisted me cannot give me a solid update regarding the new services or products that GoDaddy offers.  Almost like they were clueless of the products and services offered. In another case one of the customer support team who said that he was with this company for more than 3 years now can only offer me a poor excuse for trouble shooting. He was sheepish enough to admit that he only underwent 2 weeks of training before he was let loose to talk on the phone. If they would ask me, better tie him down until he learns to assist customers in a proficient manner. If this is the best that this company has to offer, then they are running their business down on the ground. I am thankful though that I got my reimbursement to keep my domains still running on GoDaddy but this makes me feel sick to my stomach since I don't know If I can really trust them this much.

I don't like how they try to upsell you different services when you checkout for a simple web hosting service.  If you're not careful you can end up accidentally purchasing something.  I have requested that they add me to their no call list as well.  I do purchase web domain with them, but I prefer not to host with them.

The uptime is certainly a grab bag.  There could be periods were your site will be up and running smoothly.   However, there are times when your site is offline with a 500 error message.  Very frustrating. 

There are good things about GoDaddy, but some of their support is useless.  I have mixed feelings about them, but I wouldn't recommend them to others.


 
 
 
 



I can't understand why this review of GoDaddy is so negative.   Because my experience has been nothing but great!

Call me a happy camper, GoDaddy has help me sign up with managed Wordpress hosting without any hassle.  I have the business plan for 9.99/month.  The installation was quick and easy.  As simple as three clicks of the mouse. I was able to transfer my site with ease.  Really, I was kind of worried about the switch, but their techs are awesome!    I migrated over from Hostgator and have never been happier. It was a surprisingly quick process that did not eat a lot of my precious time. After all, I am running on a hectic schedule as an ecommerce owner.  I was concerned that I would have to start calling customers to let them know where their packages were, but I didn't have to! I am proud to say that I have never experienced any single downtime ever since I availed of their service.   It has been 3 months and still running strong!  I was quite impressed about how patient their customer support is. I was almost out of my wits being worried about how to update my domain name from a new name. GoDaddy team has given me the total support by allowing me to make the shift so easy. Since the process was super-fast and efficient, it was not hard for me to inform my loyal customers about the name change. In no time, my new domain name was up and running. 

Tim and Chris provided me with the best customer support ever! They did a good job of guiding me and patiently taking their time in understanding my situation. They even guided me with the entire process of the change in name. From the bottom of my heart, I cannot thank GoDaddy's team enough for what they have done. As a business owner I am aware that the success of a business lies greatly on people whom customers can trust and these good people are just some of them. Keep up the good work guys. My future business plans include adding a few more sites with the help of this GoDaddy team. Kudos to you guys!

I highly recommend you use GoDaddy if you're unhappy with their current web hosting provider.  They are earned my trust and I am loyal customer of theirs.


 
 
 
 



It has been more than a year now since I joined GoDaddy. When I started with their service, everything was smooth sailing. Until one day, something came up that I consider being a big issue with me. I am referring to their online webmail. When I started with them, I was able to use multiple email addresses. 
I am a bit annoyed about having to keep several different passwords for each of this email addresses, but I can still manage to live with it. What made me mad was when everything went wrong and my email got deleted on their servers. When I call up their customer support lo and behold, they told me that my mailboxes on their European servers were completely erased.  WTF? When I prod some more as to why it was so, they explained that under European laws they cannot retain this data. 

This is totally unacceptable from my perspective because I trusted them to protect my mailboxes by setting up dependable backups. What kind of website host company would this be if it cannot protect this very important part of my site? I should have followed my friend's advice when he told me to use another host because he has heard some bad things in how they run some part of their web hosting service. I feel that I was deprived of my rights as a customer. If I had known that this would happen, I would not touched an inch of GoDaddy. This not only exemplifies unprofessional service, but makes me feel as if they have robbed me of something valuable. 
I have lost tons of contacts, and lots of emails which I really need.  There is nothing they can do about the situation though.  I guess I am just lost on that aspect of my business.

I am packing up and leaving GoDaddy right away.  I wouldn't recommend this host on my biggest enemy.  Stay away from them!  No good!


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy is a great company that I have used for 3 years now.  What makes them stand out from the rest is their support.  Their support is fantastic.  They are always around to help you if a problem ever does arise.  So far there hasn't been one problem they didn't know the answer to.  They are a lot cheaper than other companies and I buy domain names for only .99.  I have Economy hosting with them which is 19.99/month for a VPS server.  It comes with 1 TB of bandwidth a month.  Other companies will only allow you 500 GB to 750 GB and charge you nearly double!  With them you're paying for local based customer support too.  I highly recommend them for anyone looking to start a website.  Awesome!


 
 
 
 



I have thrown my hands up in the air with GoDaddy.  No matter what we do we can't get the email to work properly.  Our emails just bounce back.  They don't go through.  Never have never will.  We have went back and forth with them for 2 months and nothing worked.  I guess we have learned our lesson with them.  Don't use them if you care one bit about your email.  Looking for a new host as I write this.


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy has amazing customer support.  Today my website had a endless loop.  No matter what I did I couldn't get it to operate correctly.  GoDaddy's support help me diagnose the problem and found out the issue was in the .htaccess file.   

Rather than just fix it they showed me exactly how to prevent the issue from happening again.  They are an excellent company and I have been using them for 2 years.  I highly recommend you check out them if you're not already using them.  Awesome!


 
 
 
 



If there is one thing I have learned over the years it's that you shouldn't host with GoDaddy.  Their servers are very slow, frequent hacks, and they are not very reliable.  I only buy domain names with them and will never host with them.  I made the mistake of hosting with them 2 years ago.  There is a good saying at WordCamp "Friends don't let friend use GoDaddy."


 
 
 
 



Honestly, I have gotten to the point where I want to charge an extra 10% if my client is using Go Daddy.  First, their uptime and performance are horrible.  Your site could be up running fine one minute, but later in the day might be down completely.  A number of times I have moved a simple Wordpress site to their servers only to find that for whatever reason it had issues and did not function correctly on their servers.  Thinking I might have done something wrong I would try it again.

A number of times I have picked up the phone and chatted with them on the phone.  Each time they tell me they don't offer any technical support for moving a site on the Wordpress CMS.  Instead they just point me to an article which is out of date but shows you how to do it step by step.  Listen, I understand how to move a website, but the problem isn't on my end; it's on your misconfigured servers.

Secondly, configuring a simple IMAP email with them is quite the chore.  It either takes forever to propagate over or they will suspend your account once you get so many emails.  I have had a couple clients which had to resort to changing their MX records so that their email would push through Gmail or Yahoo.  Getting the simple email app to work on my iPhone has never worked with them either.

There control panel isn't user friendly.  You have to search under every tab in order to look for the changes you want to make.  It is really a huge chore.  Loading times are quite a bit slower than other host, and sites will go down for no apparent reason.  I have seen sites go down for days on end and Go Daddy doesn't provide any assistance for getting them back up.

The long and short of it is don't use their service.  Their servers are slow, buggy, and support won't do anything to help troubleshoot any issues you have.  Really, I am going to start charging people 10% more if they are persistent on using GoDaddy.  AVOID!


 
 
 
 



Once again my website has an internal 500 error message.  It seems to be completely random.  I could go two weeks with the website running smoothly or I could go 12 hours with it running smoothly.  Each and every time I call them they are somewhat helpful, but the problem keeps happening.  I have had a number of people email me because they wanted to know if I was having any technical difficulties.  

I am in the process of looking for another web hosting company.  Time and time again I find myself having to stop whatever I am doing to get this repeat problem sorted out.  Never again!


 
 
 
 



The amount of support you get from this company is fantastic.  I am new to web design and was interested in starting a "Wordpress" based site.  I had a couple issues installing the CMS on my site and picked up the phone and talked to one of their techs.  They were more than helpful!  Within 10 minutes I got my issue resolved and owe a big thanks to GoDaddy.


 
 
 
 



Weebly is better than GoDaddy.  Even the free version, but if you want to upgrade you won't be let down.  With GoDaddy you can create a website, but sadly it's going to look like every other website you see on the net.  Not to mention it will run buggy.  I have wasted about 3 months; I have been let down by poor site performance as well.  My site commonly takes 6-10 seconds to load.  Customer service is very helpful, though.  I do have a number of domain names with them.  I don't think they are horribly bad, but I don't use them.  2 out of 5.


 
 
 
 



I have never been one to trust online reviews.  While I do feel this review is bias; I would have to say that for the most part my friends in the tech field also don't recommend that you host with them.  Their servers run pretty buggy, if your not careful when checking out you can accidentally buy something you don't want, and their servers are actually quite slow, but still there are far worse companies.

Having said that.  I think all web hosting providers do have issues and problems and I do feel that the information in this review is kind of outdated.  I don't feel that they cram their servers with thousands of websites as this review shows.  Also, the integration with cPanel was a smart move on GoDaddy's part.  For years this drove me up the wall!  I think this drastically reduced the amount of 500 errors.

It is very hard to navigate different bells and whistles on the backend of the control panel though.  I commonly find myself hunting and pecking for exactly what I want.  But, they do a wonderful job at domain name management and their customer support is very helpful.

They are brilliant at marketing!  They have transitioned from the smut they used to do to market themselves.  Now they just run creepy commercials and play into the whole you can quit your job and start a website jive.  Maybe it's because they are under new management.  Bob Parsons was their CEO, but now Blake Irving is.  I guess everyone has a different way they would run a company.

They are cheap, but I guess you get what you pay for.  I give them 3 stars.  I buy domain names with them all the time, but try not to host with them if I don't have to.  Not as bad as you make them out to be, but I do agree their are much better host out there.


 
 
 
 



I've had a dedicated server with them for 3 years now and love it.  It works flawlessly and their support is awesome!  Last year I actually purchased a domain name.  It was a typo (I added an extra s to the domain name that I wanted) and I contacted GoDaddy and they immediately gave me a refund.  I have done this with Namecheap before, but they wouldn't do what they did.  Not really a lot of money, but it's a nice gesture.  With Go Daddy I can always expect that my server will be up 100% of the time.  The customer care that you receive with them is very good, too.  I recommend them to anyone that is looking for an affordable host.  I am a loyal customer of theirs and will continue to use them for all my websites or future plans.  5 out of 5.


 
 
 
 



I am in the United Kingdom and for about 2 years I had nothing but kind to words to say about them.  The problem with GoDaddy is they don't backup your emails, so I lost over 2 years worth of emails.  The reason is because they are on a pod 7 server.  Apparently GoDaddy informed me that they had laws in the United Kingdom where they can't provide backups to your email.  Total fail from them!  Don't use them!


 
 
 
 



The V7 website builder all looks good from the surface, but once you start using it you'll be let down.  It is painlessly simple to use but, the issue I have with it is my footer does not show where it is supposed to.  At times it runs along the sidebar or doesn't even show up.  Not to mention a lot of the tabs don't work or have issues.  Their techs have charged me about 200 so far because each and every time I call them they want to upsell me a different product.  

Since giving GoDaddy a shot I have just started using Wordpress and Web Hosting Hub with seems a lot more flexible one what you can do.  I have also purchased headway which is an awesome theme that has the grid structure and guess what it actually works correctly.

Two thumbs down and middle finger to them!  I don't recommend GoDaddy to anyone!  Horrible!


 
 
 
 



I have used GoDaddy for about 5 months.  Our website takes about 7-8 seconds to load with CloudFlare installed!  It's quite obvious it's an issue with GoDaddy's servers.  We started with a shared plan but later migrated to a VPS server.  It didn't make one lick of difference on the site speed.  I can say that customer service is very helpful though.  True they are very cheap, but I wouldn't use them again.  Since then I have switched to InMotion hosting and they are 10x better.  Our site now loads in 1.6 seconds!


 
 
 
 



We are using the site builder with GoDaddy and it runs really buggy at times.  A lot of the times the site builder doesn't connect so we find ourselves only updating our website when it works.  We have called GoDaddy a number of times and every single time they reset our servers.  They never do anything to resolve the issue.  It is getting pretty old dealing with this issue.  Been doing it for 4 months now.

Currently, we are looking for another web hosting company.  I have documented all of our problems with them.  I have got their phone number on speed dial.  Same problem seems to keep happening once a week.  They have lost our business for good now!  Don't use the, because they are complete waste of time!


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy has some of the best support hands down!  Jane easy fixed our problem with our site which NameCheap could never resolve.  So glad we migrated to them.  They are one of the cheapest and best hosting services we have ever used.  What is not to love about 1.99 domains too!  I highly recommend if your looking for a dependable web hosting company you use them.  5 out of 5 stars.  I would give them 6 if it was an option. LOL.


 
 
 
 



Go Daddy is a fabulous hosting company.  They have a lot of features and amazing customer support.  What I like about there customer support it is local based so you're not going to be talking with someone who is in India.  They are very smart and their technical knowledge surpasses any other web hosting company.

I highly recommend that you use GoDaddy.  You can always count on them!


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy is great at marketing their company with creepy ads on tv.  When I first started designing websites I used their service.  However, since then I have talked with a lot of webmasters and IT people and they always tell me to stay away from them.  Reluctant to take their advice I still managed to use their service.

I have had issues with support only giving me generic responses which just pointed me to an article they had written.  It's really sad because I would point out the problems and show them I already read that and they would just send me back to the article.  Getting them to do anything is simply a long hard task.  I do use them for domain names, but I prefer to not host with them.  I give them 3 out of 5 stars.  Not horribly bad, but I wouldn't recommend them either.

Since leaving them and using SiteGround I have found that they are much faster than GoDaddy.


 
 
 
 



This company is the absolute worst company in the world.  My website has been down 6 times in 2 days.  I keep getting 500 errors every time I want to make some updates or changes.  I have called them and talked to them a number of times.  All their tech team tells me is sir it's working now.  Then they will go through their process to run an anti-virus program on it but nothing comes back.  I have done this 4 times already.  Obviously, they have some issues but no one care to fix them.  Whenever my site is up it's running insanely slow!  It's been 2 weeks of this nonstop headache and I am finally packing up my site and looking for another hosting company. 

Avoid GoDaddy!


 
 
 
 



This has got to be the worst experience I have ever had with a company.  Not just a hosting company, but a company period.  Their support is down right rude, and they treat you like you don't know anything.  It took 4 days to propagate a website over to their server.  The tech team even told me that the hosting plan I purchased doesn't support much of anything.  Funny, because when I talked to your sales team they told me it would do everything I wanted and more.  So who should I believe the person that wants me to spend the money or the tech team?  Every time I call them I have to go through a verification process and I am on hold for 15-20 minutes.  My emails bounce back on my server, site takes ages to load, and downtime is obviously a big issue with them.  Rather than making sure I am happy with my service GoDaddy will call me and try to sell me extra stuff I don't want.  Go Daddy is a piece of junk company.

Horrible experience and I hope they go bankrupt!


 
 
 
 



Pathetic service, takes 24 hours to respond, closes tickets without resolving the issue, no live chat, very difficult to raise a ticket, and there's no way you can see the status of the ticket, once the domain is purchased you are a slave, Avoid at any cost!


 
 
 
 



I should have read the reviews before signing up with godaddy.  I wasn't aware that most experienced webmasters laugh when they hear the name godaddy.  Seriously, I have talked with a number people on Twitter that just won't host with their service.  This is how I found this review.  TBWHS actually told me that they will buy domain names with them, but they won't host with godaddy even if you put a gun to their head!  I was so pumped about starting my first website, but godaddy has killed my dreams of operating a website.  Nothing works correctly and I have a number of errors which show up a various times throughout the day.  I did receive a call from godaddy wanting me to buy some extra features for my site.  Maybe they should make sure I am happy before trying to sell me more features!  AVOID!


 
 
 
 



I have had some issues with Go Daddy which have caused me a lot of trouble over the last 3 months.  They keep billing me twice for my shared plan.  The first month I thought it was resolved, but as luck would have it, it wasn't.  The following two months that I used them the problem has persisted.  They would not refund my money and only offered to give me credit for the double billing.  WTF!  Good job GoDaddy because you have lost yet another customer!  I finally, got fed up with GoDaddy and their billing department and moved my site to WebHostingHub.com.


 
 
 
 



I have used GoDaddy for a number of years.  Here are the good points:

Cheap.
Pretty reliable.
Good customer support.

The bad news is:

I have been having issues with my email accounts for about 2 months and counting now.  After about 2 months or so emails seem to disappear.  I have read their policy and no where does it state that emails are supposed to be deleted after 60 days.  I have went back and forth with GoDaddy a number of times and can't understand why it keeps happening.  It's gotten to the point where I am just going to change my MX records to Gmail!

Also, I have a number of clients that want to use their website builder and there seems to be a lot of issues with it.  They will call me for assistance, but I can only help them so much before I have to charge them for my time.


 
 
 
 



I used GoDaddy 3 years ago and since then I figured I would give them another shot.  I wanted to try them again because they are now using cPanel and frankly they are quite cheap.  They couldn't be that bad now could they?  Well, yes they do offer cPanel now they still seem to have the same issues as before.  500 errors still are problematic, and their performance isn't anywhere compared to Hostmonster.  This was sort of a trial run to see if they have improved any over the years.  They haven't.  Moving my site back to good old reliable Hostmonster.  Don't use GoDaddy they are still horrible!


 
 
 
 



When I first started web designing I began with GoDaddy because they were the cheapest out there.  But you get what you pay for.  If you don't need to make any changes once you set up, it works just fine.  I never had any glitches or problems at first.  However, once I became more advanced and wanted to make changes or move sites around, then it became a bit of a mess.  GoDaddy made things really easy to join and take your money, but beyond that you had to jump through hoops.  And despite being a paying client, there was no adequate customer service.  I eventually left GoDaddy for 1and1 and have been much happier.  I've been with 1and1 for years now and recommend it to any who ask.


 
 
 
 



I never have left a negative review in my life, but with GoDaddy I am so pissed.  Nothing works correctly.  Their website builder is an absolute joke.  It doesn't work on Chrome and only half the time on FireFox.  I have called customer service 4 times and counting now to resolve the issue.  I feel like I am wasting my time if I can't get a simple website builder to work for me.  They state that it's very easy to use, but the hard part is actually getting it to load.  I have the latest updates on my browser and I can't understand how they could possibly put out such a poor piece of software.  Don't use their website builder because it's nothing but trouble!  I am currently looking for another easy to use site builder.  I have looked into 1&1 but I have heard they have horrible customer support.  Not sure what to do now.


 
 
 
 



This is a word of warning to anyone looking to transfer away from Go Daddy.  It's not an easy task.  At least it wasn't for me.  You see if you have a private domain name like a lot of webmasters do then your going to run into trouble.  First, you have to make sure you turn off privacy.  Then there is a 60 day window where you have to wait!  No joke!  Even if your domain name expires in 17 days you have to wait for 60 days.  I talked to them on the phone and they told me there is nothing they can do.  So I guess that means you have to pay them more and wait it out.  Sure, it's great for Go Daddy because your going to have to pay 9.99/year and then whenever you transfer to another host possibly more.  Way to lose a customer Go Daddy, and you even put a bad taste in my mouth too.  I guess this is why so many webmasters hate Go Daddy so much!


 
 
 
 



GoDaddy is just a politician.  Why?  Because recently, their old CEO Bob Parsons is donating half of his income to charity.  Why?  Because, he probably feels bad about what he did to get where he is.  He used smut to grow the GoDaddy.com name and ran the company into the ground.  He has done countless things to ruin their name and doesn't have any business sense at all.  

Aside from that GoDaddy.com isn't a web hosting company I would recommend on my worst enemy.  They are slow, unreliable, and bombard you with tons of upsells.  As webmasters we can all agree that GoDaddy.com isn't a good solution.


 
 
 
 



Go Daddy has been nothing but a complete nightmare for me.  You talk about the slowest web hosting company on the planet.  One of my sites takes 20 seconds to load!  Their servers are packed with 800 sites on my shared account.  I am a server technician and I know how to operate a server correctly.  They simply fail in that department.  I called them to ask if they could move my domain to another server and they told me I could upgrade to VPS.  What makes you think I would PAY MORE when I am already unsatisfied with their web hosting.  I fully understand that a shared server should have any issues with 100 hits a day, but it's not like I am asking for the world.  I am going to move my sites to Host Monster because I am pretty sure they can support my simple Wordpress and Joomla sites with no performance issues.  Avoid GoDaddy because they don't know how to maintain servers correctly.  They are sooooo slow!  Avoid AVOID avoid!!!


 
 
 
 



I considered using GoDaddy when I decided to self-host my blog but had read other negative reviews about the service. I had had experience with Bluehost a few years back and remembered that I thought their customer service was great, not that I needed it very often. I opted for Bluehost and have had no issues.


 
 
 
 



I signed up with go daddy on black friday and never wished I did.  My email freezes all the time and I can't seem to get it to work.  Wondering if I should start using gmail or yahoo because my hopes of actually getting it to work are slim to none.  The next problem is the website builder doesn't seem to work correctly.  I have loaded it in multiple browsers and can sometimes get it to load in firefox, but for chrome and internet explorer I have only got it to load 3 times.  This pretty much makes it worthless because every time I want to update something I can't.  Avoid godaddy because chances are you will have the same problems that people report time and time again.


 
 
 
 



My experience with GoDaddy has not been a fun experience.  It's gotten to be very annoying, and I can count on problems at least once a week or possibly every other week if I am lucky.  I constantly have had to call them over the last several months because my Wordpress sites keep on getting hacked.  Every time I do they ask me if I have updated to the latest version of Wordpress.  I'm using Wordpress 3.8 and I usually get around to installing the updates 2-3 days after they are rolled out.  I don't believe that the issue is due to not updating my framework to the latest versions.  Rather than me fixing the same problem time and time again I would really appreciate it if GoDaddy would actually solve the problem.  There seems to be a random code in PHP that is installed on the index page.  I have got about 2 more months with them and will be looking to migrate to another host because I am getting sick and tired of dealing with this.  Lastly, they also ask me to install another theme on the site to see if that is the problem.  I am using Genesis, MOJO, Elegant Themes, and Thesis on my sites so it doesn't have to do with a vulnerability in the framework.


 
 
 
 



I went with GoDaddy at first because of all the commercials they have on TV. A year later, I paid someone two switch my host to BlueHost. The main reason I left was because of too much downtime and slow loading speeds. Their costumer service is not friendly or helpful. BlueHost, by comparison is great and I would highly recommend them.


 
 
 
 



I agree with you Garen on most points.  I haven't used all their services but I can say for sure their speed is really subpar.


 
 
 
 



I have one small site on their shared hosting, I never had any problem at all and I haven't had any problems either when I cancelled one of my accounts with them.


 
 
 
 



With Go Daddy you can expect your Wordpress sites to be hacked.  Over the years I knew to stay away from them because for the longest time they didn't support cPanel.  Instead they used their own control panel which was confusing and frequently had issues working correctly.  Now, since they decided to start using cPanel I figured I would give them a try again.  Also, the fact that they were starting to use CloudLinux appealed to me, as well.  Their prices are very low and I figured I could save some money.  Well, I was wrong because even though they use cPanel now the same problems still persist.  They want you to pay extra for site security which if I did it would just be higher than Host Gator and I wouldn't really be saving any money.  I am going to transfer back to Host Gator and count my losses.  The same bugs that were prevalent with them in previous years are still there, maybe even worse.  They are still a poor web hosting company.


 
 
 
 



I have my domain names with GoDaddy & they've always been great when I've needed customer support, but their ratings at webhosting have been so poor I wouldn't go with them. And the ads are pretty creepy as Suzanne says too.


 
 
 
 



I purchased my custom domain from Go Daddy about two years ago and run a WP blog using their hosting. I'm a "small" client, so I imagine my site is bundled with a lot of others on a server. Loading time hasn't been a problem. I did have a problem with them over the summer when I could not get new posts to load sometimes. One support guy let slip that they were having problems with sites using Thesis themes. They got it sorted out in about a week. I have a new tech guy who does not recommend them. I hate their email. I find it very clunky. Lastly, their ads are simply creepy, especially the latest one with the male contortionist wearing strange make-up


 
 
 
 



My only experience with GoDaddy goes outside my blog. My webmaster handles my blog url and other landing pages. While I know she doesn't use GoDaddy I can't tell you who she DOES use. Outside my blog, a few years ago, a new car club we joined used GoDaddy just to register the domain name. We never got as far as actually using it. The only thing I am qualified to speak on is that I know registering it was easy, and the price was low. Looks like it might go either way with thumbs up or thumbs down.


 
 
 
 



I've heard so many bad things about them that I never tried them. However, I do know one company that uses them frequently for clients and has no complaints!


 
 
 
 



godaddy is an excellent web hosting company.  i have been using them for 3 years and haven't had to many issues with my service.  once i did have a problem with malware but that was during the time when godaddy was under attack.  from time to time web host will get attacked, but that is just how it works.  they took care of the situation properly and i only had about 1 hours of downtime.  in terms of speed i can say they actually perform quite well.  i can't understand why people state that they load so slowly, it doesn't make sense to me.  as stated above i have used them for 3 years and will continue to use them for all of my websites.


 
 
 
 



I signed up for them about 2 months ago and we I constantly offered upsells which I don't want.  Whenever, I talk to their support they are moderately helpful, but one thing I can always trust is their going to try to sell me a private domain, more SEO packages, or even upgrade to a dedicated server.  It's fine and I understand they want to make more money, but every time you buy something your going to be flooded with extra offers.

I did have an issue with my shared server in the first month and for some reason our hosting got suspended because of the amount of emails that were sent through my account.  It was pretty shocking because one day I just woke up and checked my Gmail and say a message stating that my account has been suspended.  I am not horribly mad at them, but I am having questions about continuing to host with them.  I guess over the next couple months I will make a final decision.


 
 
 
 



I have been a loyal customer of GoDaddy for about  3 years now.  They were excellent for the last 2 1/2 years, but lately we have been seeing a lot of downtime.  The down time is not just something minor like 5 minutes or something; it's for 5-6 hours at time.  This is really bad when a customer wants to purchase our products and thankfully one customer called to let us know our site was down.

Another thing I don't like about their service is about 3 months ago my credit card on file expired.  Since, then we now have a new IP address and it has been nothing but problems on the new IP address.  I called them to see if I could get the old one back and they told me no.  

Currently, we are in the process of shopping for a new host.  We can't afford to keep dealing with these issues every couple weeks.  Go Daddy has lost our business.


 
 
 
 



I haven't experienced any downtime with GoDaddy in nearly 7 months.  They seem to work flawlessly and I don't think their servers are slow at all.  Maybe the people that are complaining about it have a beginner shared package and expect a lot for a little.  I have a VPS plan with them and I recommend them to everyone.  I have over 20 sites on my VPS and never once experienced any issues.  Customer support is speedy and helpful to.  Only time I have had to contact them is when I needed to unlock a domain name and I have sold dozens of sites with them with no hassles.


 
 
 
 



I have recently purchased a GoDaddy web hosting domain and figured why not just host with them.  I bought a website builder and my experience has been very bad.  

1.  It doesn't load in Chrome.   I spend four days trying to get it to work and thought maybe there was something wrong with my browser.  There wasn't anything wrong with my browser.  It wouldn't load in Internet Explorer either!  I finally got it to load in FireFox.  WTF?

2.  The templates that GoDaddy offers are so limited.  For instance, if you run a insurance company like I do you only have 10 templates to choose from.  They are so generic and don't allow you to customize them much at all.

3.  There are about 12 or so fonts to choose from.  You can't add videos that rotate.  The only way I have read you can do it is by using YouTube.  I don't have a YouTube account so this is not an option for me.  The underline function doesn't even work and every time I go to cut and paste it doesn't work.  

4.  Called Go Daddy and they told me the issue was because of my browser.  I have used 3 of them.  How many more of them are there?  Very frustrated with them and just want to cancel my account and go with another company where their website builder actually works correctly.  They are horrible and I feel I wasted a lot of my time on something that was supposed to be simple.   It's always nice to get calls from Go Daddy trying to sell me more stuff too.  Maybe they should make sure I am happy before they try to sell me more junk!


 
 
 
 



I was disappointed by how the customer service support handled my inquiry. They cause my site to be down for 14 hours.  This is unexceptable! I thought they can assist me with my concern after I added a Cname, which by the way took down my entire website. When I called GoDaddy's customer support they told me that it would take several hours for them to fix my site. I waited until the following day, but still to no avail. I called the same hotline and talk to an impolite person who pointedly told me that it was my server who was the culprit and not GoDaddy who was responsible for my down time. Can you believe that?  They don't even take responsibility for their wrong doing.  The ironic thing is that I finally have my problem fixed in a jiffy after my site's chief technology officer (CTO) connected with somebody from this web hosting provider. Now, somebody really did take an action and I was able to get out of a big mess. I am questioning how their customer service works. If I was not able to take hold of my CTO I would still be in the same situation.   As if to add insult to injury, they did not compensate me for the downtime. It was agonizingly difficult wondering what happen to my website; with no one helping me resolve my predicament. I would suggest that if you value your site do not subscribe to this service or use this company. You will repent why you trusted them in the first place. One thing more, GoDaddy's email system stinks. It bounces back and forth, but this issue is not yet resolved up to this day.  I was let down by GoDaddy and wouldn't recommend them to anyone else.


 
 
 
 



I transferred to Go Daddy for my web hosting recently purely because their prices appeared to be so much more competitive than many others, and it was a name I was familiar with. What a headache this turned out to be!

I would not by any means class myself as a professional web designer but for the last 10 years I have switched between a number of different hosting providers and have never had any issues publishing my sites directly through the web design software I use. With Go Daddy all I got was a blank page when I published my sites, despite following their rather complicated instructions and in desperation trying my own way of doing things when this didn't work.

As there is no live support I tried posting a question in the relevant section of their forum which resulted in no reply. An e mail to the support team did result in a reply, but not a solution and I was advised to contact the telephone support team. After 10 minutes on the phone, (which cost me £1.50) the adviser finally told me there must be something wrong with the software I was using and she could not tell me how to rectify the problems I was facing.

I continued to try and upload content through Go Daddy for one more day, and I even resorted to using two different web creation programs to see if this made any difference. All of my attempts resulted in a blank page, no matter what I tried to do.

At this point I admitted defeat and asked for my money back.

To be fair to Go Daddy, I was refunded immediately. However what annoyed me slightly was that as part of my hosting package I was \"given\" one domain name of my choice. When I asked what was going to happen to the domain name after canceling my hosting they told me the cost of the free domain would be deducted prior to refunding me. I was more than a little annoyed when I realized that the the cost of the \"free\" domain was in fact double what I could have paid for it elsewhere.

Thankfully I have found an alternative web hosting package through 000webhost.com, where everything is kept nice and simple and they even offer a free hosting option for those who only need the basics. I managed to publish my site through them instantly without any issues. Had I looked a little beyond the well known name of Go Daddy in the first place I could have saved myself a lot of hassle and a little money too.

My advice to anyone like myself who does not need an all singing all dancing hosting package and who prefers to use their own web design software, is to stay well clear of Go Daddy.


 
 
 
 



I have had quite an up and down roller coaster ride with Go Daddy.  I always try to steer clients away from them, but over the years I have had a couple clients that were set on using their service.  I try to warn them, but one thing I can always trust is that we are going to have issues with GoDaddy no matter what.  It's really quite sad.  This is all to true, 500 errors are all to common, very slow loading times, and they are actually kind of rude on the telephone.  Please do not use Go Daddy if you want to actually get stuff done in a timely manner.  Wish I could give them ZERO stars! AVOID!


 
 
 
 



I have heard some horror stories about GoDaddy, but I was thinking that people just didn't know what they were doing.  Well, truth be told I learned the hard way and did a website for a client using GoDaddy for web hosting.  It was the biggest mistake of my life.  I have never had so much trouble navigating the dashboard and eventually just cut my losses and migrated to Site5.


 
 
 
 
 

 





















OverallReliabilityServer SpeedCustomer SupportFeaturesCost





 

 




 GoDaddy is a household name and a very well known domain registrar (millions of websites call GoDaddy there home), as well as a hosting company.  Unless you have been living under a rock for the last 10 years chances are you’ve probably heard of them. Many people are actually surprised that they are also a web hosting provider.  You might be interested to know what other webmasters are saying about GoDaddy.  Are they experiencing positive or negative experiences with them? However, as I have said many times I will buy domain names with them; I certainly will not host with them. There are many other competing companies such as InMotion which I would recommend ten-fold over GoDaddy. Unfortunately, a lot of first time webmasters make the mistake of giving them a try, only to be let down by countless problems.
Rather than me just writing a negative review on them I want to dive deep into what hosting features they offer, how good their uptime is, what you can expect with performance, and last but not least how good is their customer support.  I have developed a rating system at the top of this page which shows how I rate them as a web hosting provider.  I look at all kinds of information on the internet and try to write the most accurate review of their service, the best I can.  So, stay tuned because my GoDaddy review will give multiple reasons on why I do not recommend you do business with them.

GoDaddy Features


GoDaddy, like most competing web hosting companies offers a wide variety of web hosting packages that you can choose from.  Obviously, they offer domain names, but they also offer shared, VPS, and dedicated web hosting.  Below I am going to show you all the plans they are offering at this time.
GoDaddy’s Shared Plans

The 3 plans they are currently offering for shared hosting are:

Economy (lowest $4.99/month).
Deluxe (medium $5.99/month).
Premium (highest $7.99/month).

These packages are a great option for blogs, local sites, small businesses, and any type of site that isn’t going to receive over 150 unique visitors per day.  They come fully integrated with all the latest bells and whistles to get your website up to speed.  The prices are quite cheap compared to other web hosting companies.
GoDaddy’s VPS Plans

The 5 plans they are currently offering for VPS are:

Economy ($29.99/month).
Value ($39.99/month).
Deluxe ($59.99/month).
Premium ($79.99/month).
Ultimate ($149.99/month).

I am giving you the prices based on a month to month basis.  If you pay for your service 6, 12, 24 months in advanced you’ll receive a lower monthly rate.  These VPS packages are great for medium to large sized business’s and come with a plethora of resources to handle large volume of web traffic.
GoDaddy’s Dedicated Plans

For dedicated plans they offer are:

Economy ($99.99/month).
Deluxe ($199.99/month).
Premium ($299.99/month).
Value Deal ($149.99/month).
Power Player ($249.99/month).
MemoryHog which is also ($249.99/month).

Express Email Marketing
 If you’re considering an email plan with GoDaddy they offer 3 packages which should be able to accommodate all your email needs.  Let’s take a look at the three email packages:

Economy  (9.99/month) 500 subscribers
Deluxe (12.99/month) 2,500 subscribers
Premium (19.99/month) 10,000 subscribers

Premium will allow you to purchase upgrades of up to 100,000 subscribers for $150/month. I should note that every plan comes with an easy email editor, 20,000 images which you can customize your campaigns, easy sign-up forms for your websites, real-time tracking, and social media integration.
SSL Certificates
GoDaddy does offer a number of different SSL certificates for those webmasters that are doing a lot of transactions online.Meaning, that if you run an eCommerce site GoDaddy should be able to accommodate your needs.These SSL’s are strong SHA-2 & 2048- bit encryption.Meaning that you’ll get the best possible encryption that you can find.They are backed by a million dollar liability protection policy.This is great a lot of other hosting companies will not offer this much protection.Their SSL’s operate with one-click installation.The prices and details for their SSL’s are down below:

SiteLock
One thing a lot of eCommerce owners are concerned about is hackers.Since, running an online business is often vulnerable to spyware and viruses it makes perfect sense to use SiteLock to insure that your websites are secure.This not only finds malware but also secures the gaps so that hackers have less of a chance of breaking into your website.The details and prices are down below:

Site Support
Also, like most other companies they do offer you a free domain when you decide to host with them. However, nearly almost every web hosting company I have reviewed offers the same thing. GoDaddy is simply no different in allowing you to acquire a domain with a hosting package. GoDaddy will allow you to host your website on 3 different types of OS, CentOS, Ubuntu, Fedora.  Optionally, you can always use the Windows operating system if you desire to.  For configuring your servers you can use Plesk, and as of lately they even allow you to use cPanel.    Announced in 2013, GoDaddy is even going to be partnering with CloudLinux to protect their clients servers, in terms of stability and security. Really, GoDaddy is a feature-rich web hosting provider that should easily provide you any and everything you need to get a website up and running.  You can purchase website builders, SEO services, etc.
Now, that we know all the features GoDaddy offers lets give them a test drive.

GoDaddy Performance



GoDaddy does have performance issues.  They are not as fast as Danica Patrick.

My Godaddy Review from this point on simply goes south and here is why. Speed is definitely a big factor and I was unfortunate to learn this first hand. In the very beginning of my online ventures before I new anything about web development and really anything about how to develop and build a website I learned an important lesson with GoDaddy.
Here are the response times I have found with GoDaddy:
As you can see I have tested GoDaddy’s response times on Phonegallery.com which is a website that is hosted on GoDaddy and I have found that average response times are .60. Yeek! I tend to want a response time under .30 for fast loading sites. But, with GoDaddy it’s double!

What is sad is GoDaddy is now using CloudLinux so they have promised webmasters that you won’t have any issues with their servers in terms of performance anymore. Well, the numbers don’t lie and I checked their response times with SiteUptime.com.  CloudLinux is supposed to drastically reduce the server load, but why are response times still so high with them?
500 Errors

500 errors showed up various times throughout the day. There was really no rhyme or reason for this but as I would begin to work on my website I would get an error message deeming my site useless for the time being. It wasn’t tell I picked up the phone and called them a number of times that I started to realize maybe the issue was with the server in which my site was on. Being a little obsessed with getting to the bottom of this I Googled “GoDaddy WordPress problems” and found I wasn’t the only one with 500 error issues (everyone was pissed about it). It wasn’t until about 9 months later that I finally got tired of dealing with constant problems that I finally made the switch. I switched to InMotion which has been 110% everything I could have asked for and more. SO, back to GoDaddy and their speed issues which I soon found damn my site actually loads quickly now, once I made the switch. This wasn’t just with shared packages as people might suggest, but my shared plan on InMotion actually outperformed GoDaddy’s VPS servers. Go figure! So all the lies about GoDaddy using the latest server redundancy is pure hype, because they try to cram way to many people on one server. One would even wonder if they have a limit to the number of people that are allocated to their servers. Perhaps they are successful in marketing their business while failing to listen to demands of the many unruly customers they have accumulated over the years.
Speed With GoDaddy
Expect your sites to load slow with GoDaddy.
GoDaddy actually crams their servers with tons and tons of different websites.  It’s really a free for all when hosting with them.  Your website could load quickly but 8 times out of 10 it will have performance issues.  For anyone that is interested in developing a high quality website that real people actually read, you need to understand that loading times are a huge issue in terms of SEO.  If you’re website takes a long time to load and your bounce rate increases drastically.  Google will lower your rankings. I can personally attest to this, as I have seen it first hand that loading times are drastically increased with GoDaddy.  Forget GoDaddy stating that they use server redundancy because it doesn’t do squat when you load thousands of websites on a single “shared” server.
This post on authormedia.com backs up my claims that GoDaddy has major issues with performance.
As mentioned on the features part of this article GoDaddy is going to be partnering with CloudLinux in 2014, so I will be watching them closely to see if their speed and stability has made any substantial gains.  I’ll even start up a test site and monitor my findings to see if they have resolved the problems I have noted above. It literally pays to NOT host with GoDaddy.  
Uptime With GoDaddy
So does GoDaddy live up to the 99.9% uptime that they guarantee?  Well, no!  It’s pretty clear to say that GoDaddy states that their servers will be up 99.9 percent of the time, but in actuality that isn’t really the case.  This would mean that your server would be down for roughly 45 minutes per month.  This could be for 11 minutes and 45 second per week, which isn’t too bad.  You might be surprised to hear that there was actually a class action lawsuit against GoDaddy for these claims. So what is a more realistic uptime that you can expect with GoDaddy?  More like 97.8%.  As mentioned above they over crowd their servers with thousands and thousands of different websites so it seems to be hit or miss.  You could have some intermittent downtime or you might noticed that you have very little downtime.


BBB Rating

One thing that a lot of people are not aware of is GoDaddy’s Better Business Bureau rating.They have acquired an A+ rating from the BBB.However, at a glance an A+ rating looks fantastic.I checked their BBB rating on December 10th, 2014.But, if you did a little deeper into the rating you’ll actually find that they have 807 complaints against them.428 of these complaints are from webmasters that had problems with their products/services.240 of these complaints are billing/collection issues.Keep in mind that since they are such a big company they are going to get more complaints than smaller companies in this industry.However, as I told you I would be monitoring GoDaddy more and more in 2014 and 2015 I found that 288 of these complaints have been filed in just 12 months!
GoDaddy’s Customer Service
 With GoDaddy I really don’t have a lot of issues with their customer service. You do have to keep in mind that since they are the biggest company they are going to be under the biggest fire from their customers. Obviously, take everything you read on the internet with a grain of salt. Whenever I called them they were moderately helpful except for the one time I called them and they were reluctant to run a virus scan on my site after being hacked a number of times.  I did it myself and found the issues so it was just a little added work, but nothing major.  Typically, when I talk to GoDaddy it’s just to unlock a domain name and they are always helpful. They have telephone support, live chat (which is new in 2013), and support tickets.  They are fairly quick on answering any questions and concerns you might have.  Over the years I have noticed that their customer service has improved a lot.  But, with that being said there are still other web hosting companies that exceed them. Over the years I have worked on a number of clients websites and they bought there domain there, which when you have to call them to unlock a token to transfer a domain they are always helpful and quick to aid in assisting me.

GoDaddy Summary
 You’re in for a lot of of headaches with their web hosting. They are all hype and there are number of issues they need to iron out before I can consider hosting with them.  True, they are making massive improvements by partnering with CloudLinux and cPanel, but this remains one company I will be monitoring in 2014.  I still just have a number of questions with them. From a glanced they look great, but once you dive deeper into their hosting you’ll soon be let down.  A lot of webmasters have fallen into the trap of using GoDaddy, only to migrate away from them once they got tired of dealing with their issues.  I would like to hear from any employees of GoDaddy to let us know what you’re doing to better your web hosting service. There are so many better options out there so I can’t recommend their service at this time.
GoDaddy has left a bad taste in my mouth.  Sadly, this bad taste has been in my mouth for years.  A lot of webmasters will tell you to choose another host, as well.  There are number of performance/technical issues with them.  Their control panel really gives me a headache.  I find it hard to navigate.  A lot of webmasters I talk to have shared their horror stories with me.  If GoDaddy could address these problems I have with them I would be happy to reevaluate them.  Possibly, if they met my standards I could then recommend them.
I do buy domain names with them but I do not host with them.  No, I am not stating that GoDaddy is horrible company, but there are better options out there, like InMotion and WebHostingHub.
Please feel free to leave me and others comments (up above) about your personal experiences with GoDaddy so that everyone can benefit from it. I would highly encourage you to share this GoDaddy review on Facebook, Twitter, StumbleUpon, etc. by pushing the social media buttons down below.  As always, thanks for taking the time to read my review on them.


I started this special section for . Obviously, I do not recommend their service. I just feel there are so many other companies out there that are so much better. True, I did host with them years ago, and I have used their service in the past. It doesn’t always seem to be great experience for a lot of webmasters including myself. I get a steady stream of comments that come in every month. Some praise them and others tell you to stay away from them.
But, from the research I have done on GoDaddy it looks like there is a plethora of content about their company. So, below are going to be some popular articles I have found on GoDaddy. I will include good content (that praises) their company and also negative content (that doesn’t exactly speak very highly of them). Also, there will be some neutral articles on them.
“Positive”
Positive Articles On GoDaddy
GoDaddy About Us

From a quick glance at GoDaddy’s about us page you can find that they have an impressive resume.Nearly every webmaster has heard of the name “GoDaddy” at one time.There is a reason they have grown so rapidly over the years.  Love them or hate them you have to give them a ton of respect for their marketing campaigns.They are absolutely fantastic at marketing.  At a time when there were very few domain registrars GoDaddy soared past the competition, quickly.There is even a GoDaddy bowl game for college football and of course as we all know, they advertise during the Super Bowl.
GoDaddy is the worlds largest domain registrar.Currently, no other company beats them in terms of clients for domain names.They control 30% of all the domain names.This means that they have 58 million domains under their management.They currently, have 12 million customers, 14 facilities and more than 4,000 employees.
Simply put, GoDaddy isn’t just a startup brand that is going to take your money and run.They are established and have been in business since 1997.  Perhaps they are the most successful in terms of growth and client base.  While I don’t use them for web hosting I do love them for registering domain names.  What is not to love about getting a domain name for 99 cents/year!  They run a number of promotional offers where you can avail of their services for dirt cheap.

Websitebuilderexpert.com

This is a website that reviews a number of website builder programs. They have reviewed a number of website builders such as Wix, Weebly, Squarespace, and you guessed it GoDaddy. Actually, this website is really good and does have a lot of useful information about website builders. I kind of wish I would of thought to do something like this. The main focus is on GoDaddy’s website builder though. But, anyways they give 3 pros about Godaddy; easy to use with professional design themes, 24/7 support, and backup points which you can revert back to at anytime you feel like it.
Websitebuilderexpert.com does give 3 cons of GoDaddy. They are can’t change themes (you lose all your data if you do), no eCommerce tools, very basic designs for display.
For the most part it looks like their website builder has a simple builder that is easy to use. You can create a website with zero experience whatsoever. There are a variety of support, tutorials, and community resources. Jeremy Wong, the editor at websitebuilderexpert.com then rates GoDaddy website builder 4 out of 5 stars.

 
TopTenReviews.com

TopTenReviews.com has reviewed dozens and dozens of hosting companies. They put each company they review to a steep test. Meaning, that they actually try out their service and then write them up a review. Out of all the hosting companies they have reviewed they have ranked GoDaddy #2, second to JustHost. While I may disagree with their rankings on a lot of web hosting companies I am going to show you what Kent Dunn, the author of this GoDaddy review has said about them.
Features 9.4/10
They are an economical hosting service. They do offer a lot of different features. It’s a good start for those small website owners. Their plans seem to work great as long as you’re not getting a ton of traffic (10 GB) allotment. They do support all major programming languages. You are allowed 5 thousand emails per year on their entry plan.
Ease of Use 9.4/10
Ease of use is one of the best things about them. You can manage everything you need from file managers, database managers, and domain managers. It does take some time to setup MySQL databases (1 day).
Support 8.1/10
GoDaddy does have a number of FAQ’s and information for those that are looking for a knowledge base (for both advanced and newbie webmasters). You can contact them through telephone or email, but it’s a little slower to get 1 on 1 support since they have so many clients. They do respond to your request in usually 1 day.
Pros
Lots of features.
Cons
Expect to pay for more features for an extra cost.
In summary, GoDaddy is a large brand that has a lot of customers. They have stood the test of time and managed to expand over the years. They don’t love the fees for add-ons but rate them 8.95 out of 10.
Pcmag.com

This article by Jeffery L. Wilson on pcmag.com talks about the different types of plans that GoDaddy offers. He shows that for entry level sites it’s a pretty good option, but where they really excel is with their business hosting plans. Then he talks about GoDaddy’s web builder tool and how it’s really easy to use. Their builder creates a much more attractive builder than other competing companies. They have ecommerce software that has a lot more flexibility than a lot of other competing companies. You do get Adwords credits too.






 InMotion Review
 WebHostingHub Review
 GreenGeeks Review





Jeffery has also stated they have great customer support. I would have to agree with him that support is pretty good. He placed a call at 10:00 P.M. He asked a question about the plans and was really impressed with how knowledgable and friendly their customer support was. Live chat was also very helpful. He does recommend that you do business with GoDaddy. The review of GoDaddy is rated 4 out 5.
Pros

Window and Linux based servers.
Excelletn customer support 24/7.
Email is integrated into Microsoft apps.

Cons

Basic accounts lack options.
Have to pay for site builder.
higher cost than other hosting companies.

Read the full article here.

“Negative”
Forbes.com

Kelly Clay has written an article that was posted on Forbes.com.This is a somewhat older article and was published on September 10th, 2012.It has received almost a half a million views.Ok, so this article talks about the 5 reasons you should leave GoDaddy.The following points are:

Previous Sexual Advertising.GoDaddy did use a number of T.V. advertisements that air during the Super Bowl to grow their company.These ads were very sexist and defamed women.I’m sure at one time you saw the famous GoDaddy girls.


Zimbabwe Elephant Killings.Bob Parsons, GoDaddy’s old CEO went on rant and published a video on his personal blog glorifying the killings of elephants in Zimbabwe.PETA boycotted GoDaddy and removed all their sites away from GoDaddy.


Unethical Practices.“This included buying domain names users search for and then inflating the value of the domains so GoDaddy could make larger profits.”


Supporting SOPA.The SOPA bill was a bill that wasn’t passed which wanted to censor freedom of speech and activity on the internet.After GoDaddy got a lot of heat from this headline they decided to change their stance on SOPA.

The other point might have been modified from the original article because I can’t find it.I have read the article over and over again. But Kelly then gives suggestions for of other companies DreamHost & Hostgator in which you can migrate your website too.
Read the full article here.

WebHostingJury.com

WebHostingJury.com is another web hosting review site kind of like tbwhs.com. The reason I say it’s kind of like tbwhs.com is because there is no editorial review for GoDaddy. Instead the reviews are made up entirely by the users. There are nearly 200 reviews on this site. I am going to highlight some of the complaints and praises on this site:
Praises

Compared to a lot of other web hosting companies GoDaddy is cheaper.
Some customers have been with them for 15 years.
Support is very helpful with GoDaddy and they pride themselves at doing a good job.
Very cheap domain names. Promo codes are always available.

Complaints

Accessing FTP is a real chore.
They have a lot of help articles. However, some of them are outdated and the walkthroughs don’t exactly match how the interface is now.
Website builder is not a fun experience. It’s very “plain jane”. There isn’t a lot of creativity that you can do with it. There are a ton of limitations. You have to keep you the website builder because you can’t transfer to another host. It’s a way to keep customers there. It went up $2/month too.
Sometimes your on the phone for nearly an hour with GoDaddy.
Servers ran slow and you get passed around from server to server.
Canceling account is very hard. You have to scan drivers license. They don’t always cancel the right service.
Frequently get 500 error messages on WordPress sites.

People have been commenting on this GoDaddy review since 2005. There is a steady stream of complaints from webmasters. From 2014 to currently there were very few comments that were left that praised their services. Mostly, people try GoDaddy for a little while get frustrated and then migrate to another hosting company. Overall, GoDaddy gets a 2.6/5 for reliability, 2.2 out 5 for support, 3.5 out of 5 for pricing, and an overall score of 2.2 out of 5. Yet another article I am adding to my negative section.

Consumeraffairs.com

Consumer Affairs is a website that is featured on The New York Times,CNN, Forbes, AARP, NBC News, and Washington Post.They review everything for consumers from airlines, auto, credit cards, doctors, electronics, online dating, and yes you guessed it web hosting companies.Basically, the goal of Consumer Affairs is to provide lots of information for people that are considering different products and services.
They have a special section on GoDaddy for “customer complaints”.As of January 1, 2015 they have collected over 45 negative complaints about GoDaddy.This could be anything from their website builder, domain name registration, and web hosting.
It looks like there are number of past GoDaddy clients that are very upset with the company.This could be anything from billing concerns, customer support issues, hosting issues, etc.I really do like how this site shows the users full name, the location where they live, and the date in which the dispute was written.There is a rating system at the top of each users comment that shows how they rate the company.Then on the top left hand side you can see the overall satisfaction rating.Then on each complaint you can vote on whether or not the feedback was helpful or not.
To get a full understanding of what people like and dislike about GoDaddy this is an excellent resource.I have spent about 45 minutes looking through the feedback and voting on what comments I feel are the most helpful.I would highly recommend that you take the time to visit the page and see what other webmasters are saying about their experience.
Check it out here.

Nytimes.com

On a vacation Bob Parsons the CEO of GoDaddy killed an elephant in Zimbabwe.He did it forhis own personal gain, but he tried to play it off as he was saving the village. Crops were being trampled and if he killed one of the elephants the rest of the pack would run away.There was a graphical video that was showed Mr. Parsons hovering over the dead elephant while AC/DC was playing in the background.
PETA boycotted GoDaddy and encouraged others to move their sites away from GoDaddy.Ms. Gonzalez from PETA called Bob Parsons “America’s scummiest C.E.O. of the year”.This story made it’s way around the internet very quickly!
View article here.

Theregister.co.uk

Back in September 19, 2011 John Leyden wrote an article that was featured on theregister.co.uk that show there was a massive hacking attack on GoDaddy’s servers.This shows that 445 sites were injected with an injection of hostile code in the .htaccess file.
Todd Redfoot told Domain Name Wire “These accounts were accessed using the account holder’s username and password.”There are speculations that the passwords that were obtained were obtained by a phishing attack.Since then the problem has been cleared up.
View the article.

TechCrunch.com

There was a day called “dump GoDaddy day”.I know it sounds weird but ever since GoDaddy supported the bill SOPA there was a lot of outrange amongst customers.Once GoDaddy learned of the news they immediately decided to oppose the SOPA bill.
Go Daddy CEO Warren Adelman stated this comment “Go Daddy opposes SOPA because the legislation has not fulfilled its basic requirement to build a consensus among stake-holders in the technology and Internet communities. Our company regrets the loss of any of our customers, who remain our highest priority, and we hope to repair those relationships and win back their business over time.”
View the article.

WebHostingHero.com

WebHostingHero.com is more of a website for the people, by the people, rather than strong in its very essence. It’s another hosting review site like tbwhs.com which I believe is creditable.True, there are hosting review sites which I don’t feel are legit, but this one I feel is honest.
It is, however, maintained professionally by a system administrator who has been in the web development business for close to twenty years, thus this fact could be an ‘ice-breaker’ in your decision to making a good choice when choosing a web host. It does, as any other website, provide useful tips and ‘game-breaking’ moves on how to properly ascertain a good position in the web-marketing industry. Considering their review of ‘Go-Daddy’ as a website host, I found myself in front of a brick under a brick of negative, eye-lashing, catastrophic customer reviews of Go-Daddy.
WebHostingHero.com is the ‘middle-man’ and provides indirect answer by linking you directly with the community. The user reviews main focus was around Go-Daddy’s awful customer support, delayed fix of issues, and even fraudulent events, that might end up in the courtroom. Not good for Go-Daddy.
The more knowledge we can learn on Go-Daddy from various sources the better.
Furthermore, GoDaddy gets 5 out 10 stars from WebHostingHero.com.Most of the reviews do not speak very highly of the company.This is why I felt I would include yet another negative section to my research articles section.

Host-Shopper.com

Host-Shopper.com is a hosting review site just like tbwhs.com that reviews different web hosting companies.They currently have about 40 or so reviews on different companies.Robert has collected almost 60 reviews from different webmasters.Most of these reviews are not exactly praising GoDaddy’s products and services.
This website does point out all the plans you can purchase with GoDaddy.You can then compare the different plans to see how they stack up with each other.Users are always encouraged to write up a review and they will post it on their website.
The average GoDaddy rating is 1.57 out of 5.This shows that people are not praising them.Some of the problems that people have reported are SSL issues, email issues, spotty uptime, poorly train technicians, poor support, etc.There are number of users that do like GoDaddy and don’t feel the review is accurate.However, for the most part it seems to be overwhelmingly negative.
All and all, this is pretty good review site that does give readers a lot of incite on different hosting companies.It is certainly worth a read if you’re looking for more feedback on GoDaddy or any of the other companies.

“Neutral”
Whoishostingthis.com

This is an excellent web hosting review site that has been around since 2007.I really do like their website and they have done a fantastic job with it.They give their own “expert” review and have collected 350+ user responses on GoDaddy.Whoishostingthis.com really does have a lot of reviews on the most popular web hosting companies.In fact, they have over 470 companies that they have reviewed as of January 1, 2015.I’m kind of jealous of them and I need to start catching up with them.I wish I had reviewed that many companies!
Basically, GoDaddy has received 3 stars out of 5.It shows that they are not horribly bad and they do have a lot of happy clients.However, they do also have a number of reviews which don’t speak very highly of GoDaddy.The biggest complaint according to Whoishostingthis.com users seems to be their support.While I have talked to their support a number of times I never had a real problem with them.In fact, I do think that is one of the strongest assets to there business.
Anyways, the review on GoDaddy is definitely worth a read.They have developed lots of features that compare them with other hosting companies.You can also view all their plans and get a ton of feedback on them.

GoDaddy BBB Rating

I have checked GoDaddy’s BBB (Better Business Bureau) rating. I was a little torn between filing this under negative or neutral. But, I guess since there is some good and bad I will just go ahead and file it under neutral. I will explain why.
First, the good. GoDaddy is accredited with the BBB and they have been since 4/20/2000. That is a good 15 years that they have been accredited which is excellent. Their rating is an A+. This means that when customers do have problems with their services and does in fact, file a complaint against GoDaddy they do take care of it.
Now to the bad part. On the BBB.org there is a tab for “customer reviews”. This tab shows that they have 15 positive reviews, 6 neutral reviews, and 128 negative reviews. To put it in simple terms 85.9% of the reviews on the BBB are negative. Meaning that the other 15% are either positive or neutral.
GoDaddy does have over 770+ complaints. They have actually closed 327 of these in the last 12 months. The problems that are stated are advertising/sales issues (over 100), billing/collections issues (over 230), delivery issues (over 30), guarantee/warranty issues (5), and over 400 problems with products/services.



I’m really excited about the interviews section of this GoDaddy review.  What I like to do is reach out to different webmasters and do an email interview with them.  These interviews will give anyone considering them a better understanding of what they can expect with this company.  I try to mix it up with the questions, tailored to any article or content they have written on GoDaddy.  If you would like to reach me for an interview I would be more than happy to talk with you about GoDaddy.  The best way to reach me is through my contact page or you can always send me a tweet through Twitter @tbwhs.
“Jupiter_Jim”

Jupiter Jim has been using computers for 20 years. He has been a web designer since 2000 and has been a Certified Internet Webmaster (CIW) Master Designer since 2003.He is an A+ Certified technician in computer maintenance and repair.  He has been building blogs and websites exclusively with WordPress since January 2010.  He has over 100 Free Video Tutorials on his YouTube Channel.   You can find more information at JupiterJim.com and JupiterJimsMarketingTeam.com

Why do you think so many people sign up with GoDaddy.com?
People sign up with Godaddy to register their website domain names because it is so well known.Ask someone to tell you the names of 2 other web domain name registrars (besides Godaddy) and I bet you they can’t do it. I have had many web design customers over the years and it’s amazing to me that people know the name “Godaddy” but they don’t understand the difference between a ‘domain name registrar’ and a ‘web hosting company’. Godaddy allows you to register your domain name AND it has servers that allow you to host your website with them as well. So Godaddy is providing 2 completely separate and different but important functions that are critical to creating a website, but most people that want to build a website don’t understand that. They probably understand that you can ‘get your domain name’ from Godaddy, but that’s all they know about the process.
So people ‘sign up’ with Godaddy because the company name is so well known.It’s well known because they have done an excellent job branding the company through celebrity sponsors and Super Bowl ads among other things.Godaddy should be commended for their branding and marketing for sure!
What do you think are the biggest pros and cons are to Godaddy?
I like the way that Godaddy is a one stop shop for registering my domain names. I can log into one website and keep track of all my domain names if I want to. Godaddy is very good at notifying customers when their domain name is about to expire which, of course, is critical to the functioning of your website. I like their 24/7 phone support.
Downside is that Godaddy often seems to have long wait times with customer support.I know this because if I have web design clients that are using Godaddy, then I have to deal with them. Very long wait times compared to most web hosting companies, in my opinion. If you don’t hit the ‘#’ symbol on your keyboard on time to let them know you do NOT want to listen to their music while waiting on the phone,it can be very annoying.I once had to listen to about 30 minutes of ragtime music while waiting on hold at a time that I was trying to solve a client problem and just wasn’t in the mood for it.
Customer support can range from friendly and knowledgeable to downright ignorant. It’s totally random who picks up that support phone.One problem required me to call customer support 3 times before I finally got someone who was knowledgeable and knew what needed to be done to correct the problem.My guess is that the company is so big they simply don’t have time to train everyone properly.
Tell me about your past experiences working with them.  
Godaddy seems to have an excellent backup service to back up your site if you host your website with them. That’s a very good thing.
There was a speaker at a WordCamp Orlando 2014 that started off her lecture with the slide that had the words “Friends don’t let friends use Godaddy.”She was referring to their hosting service. I agree with her.No serious WordPress web designer would ever recommend Godaddy for hosting a client’s website.That tells you something right there. It seems fine for most people to register their domain name with Godaddy,but it is not advisable, in my opinion, to host your WordPress website with them.
A few months ago a client insisted I build his WordPress website on Godaddy servers since he had already paid for a special WordPress hosting account. For two days in a row, we would make changes, in the WordPress dashboard of his site to make changes to the part of the site viewed by the world. The changes would NOT register or appear on his site. The client grew very frustrated and annoyed. As soon as we moved his hosting account to WebHostingHub.com those problems disappeared and never came back. He kept his domain name registered with Godaddy, however, which is fine. And that is typical of hosting your WordPress website with Godaddy.If it’s not one thing, it’s another, so it seems.And that’s why I don’t host any of my sites with them.
Would you recommend GoDaddy?
Yes, I would recommend Godaddy as a domain name registrar.I would NOT recommend them as a host for your WordPress website.
There are things I don’t like about their television ads, the elephant hunting controversy (just google it), and some of the accusations made against them. I even tried to use another domain name registrar because of those reasons.But then that company also has problems because of the way they send their lawyers after people who write negative reviews about them. So, although there are many things I don’t like about the politics of Godaddy,I don’t know of another reliable easy to use, affordable domain name registrar that I would put my name on and recommend. In terms of my domain names, I have used Godaddy for many years and personally have NOT had any problems.
However, I would NEVER EVER recommend that anyone host their WordPress website with Godaddy, even though they now have some type of special WordPress hosting service.









 




All content on tbwhs.com are opinions and not facts.  I have thoroughly reviewed each company and then provide my personal opinions on them.  It's up to you as the consumer to do your due diligence and do more research if you feel something might be inaccurate.




 InMotion Review
 WebHostingHub Review
 GreenGeeks Review




Write A Review For $15You can earn $15/month by writing a review about a hosting company you have experience working with.  5 winners each and every month!  Please see my TOS on how this works.

Don't be scared to share...
 Featured Web Host
 
 
 
 
 

Not Recommended
 
 
 
 


 


About Us | Contact | Write A Review | FTC Compliance
 Latest Articles
Trey Gardner of GreenGeeks Talks About Reseller HostingGoDaddy – WordPress Migration – How ToMochaHost  – Lost A Customer After 3 DayscPanel User Guide – Quick Glossary OverviewView Your Website On Mobile Devices – Excellent ResourcesCopyright © 2015






































